Illinois, session 104th, SB202.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Open Meetings Act is amended by adding 5Section 2.07 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 120/2.07 new)7    Sec. 2.07. Meetings on election days; prohibited.8    (a) A unit of local government may not hold or schedule a 9meeting on the day of a general primary election, a general 10election, a consolidated primary election, or a consolidated 11election, as defined in the Election Code. 12    (b) A home rule unit may not hold or schedule meetings in a 13manner inconsistent with this Act. This Section is a denial 14and limitation of home rule powers and functions in accordance 15with subsection (i) of Section 6 of Article VII of the Illinois 16Constitution.